District of Columbia statutes.
42-2404

Duties of owners and brokers.

The owner and real estate broker shall have in place, at or before settlement, all documents, deeds, titles, recordation tax returns, certified checks, and any other monies needed for settlement so that disbursements can be made in a timely manner.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-187, § 5, 33 DCR 7681

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2804.